Massachusetts, session 194th, H4310.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Town of
Belmont is hereby authorized to enact and enforce local regulations, bylaws, or ordinances
prohibiting or restricting the use of second-generation anticoagulant rodenticides within the
boundaries of the Town, including but not limited to their use on public and private properties.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1